Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB855.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8428 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8428. Abatement of certain interest and penalty.* * *(c) Petition for abatement.--A taxpayer may file a petition for abatement of the penalty or interest due on any underpayment or tax attributable to the taxpayer with the local taxing authority. Upon receipt of the petition, the local taxing authority may abate the penalty or interest when, in the opinion of the local taxing authority, the petitioner acted in good faith, without negligence, and had no intent to defraud the local taxing authority if the petitioner agrees to pay the remaining balance owed to the local taxing authority without 12345678910111213141516171819 further appeal. A taxpayer must file a petition for abatement within 60 days of the first due date of the penalty or interest that is the subject of the petition and shall specify the reasons for seeking an abatement in the petition.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0855PN0893 - 2 - 12345